Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
Article 13 Licensing of Mortgage Lenders and Mortgage Brokers
7-1-1004.
Investigation of applicant and its officers; audit; education, experience, and other requirements relative to licensees and registrants.

Upon receipt of an application for license or registration, the department shall conduct such investigation as it deems necessary to determine that the mortgage broker and mortgage lender applicant and the individuals who direct the affairs or establish policy for the mortgage broker and mortgage lender applicant, including the officers, directors, or the equivalent, are of good character and ethical reputation; that the mortgage broker and mortgage lender applicant is not disqualified for licensure as a result of adverse administrative civil or criminal findings in any jurisdiction; that the mortgage broker and mortgage lender applicant and such persons meet the requirements of subsection (h) of this Code section; that the mortgage broker and mortgage lender applicant and such persons demonstrate reasonable financial responsibility; that the mortgage broker and mortgage lender applicant has reasonable policies and procedures to receive and process customer grievances and inquiries promptly and fairly; and that the mortgage broker and mortgage lender applicant has and maintains a registered agent for service in this state.

The department shall not license or register any mortgage broker and mortgage lender applicant unless it is satisfied that the mortgage broker and mortgage lender applicant may be expected to operate its mortgage lending or brokerage activities in compliance with the laws of this state and in a manner which protects the contractual and property rights of the citizens of this state.

The department may establish by rule or regulation minimum education or experience requirements for an applicant for a mortgage broker license or renewal of such a license.

Upon receipt of an application for a mortgage loan originator license, the department shall conduct such investigation as it deems necessary to determine that the mortgage loan originator applicant:

Has never had a mortgage loan originator license revoked in any governmental jurisdiction, except that a subsequent formal vacation of such revocation shall not be deemed a revocation;

Has not been convicted of, or pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to, a felony in a domestic, foreign, or military court; provided, however, that any pardon of a conviction shall not be a conviction for purposes of this subsection;

Has demonstrated financial responsibility, character, and general fitness such as to command the confidence of the community and to warrant a determination that the mortgage loan originator will operate honestly, fairly, and efficiently within the purposes of this article;

Has completed the prelicensing education requirement described in subsection (e) of this Code section; and

Has passed a written test that meets the test requirement described in subsection (f) of this Code section.

An individual shall complete at least 20 hours of prelicensing education courses reviewed and approved by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry based upon reasonable standards. Review and approval of a prelicensing education course shall include review and approval of the course provider. The 20 hours of prelicensing education shall include at least:

Three hours of federal law and regulations;

Three hours of ethics, which shall include instruction on fraud, consumer protection, and fair lending issues; and

Two hours of training related to lending standards for the nontraditional mortgage product marketplace.

Nothing in this subsection shall preclude any prelicensing education course, as approved by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, that is provided by the employer of the mortgage loan originator applicant or an entity which is affiliated with the applicant by an agency contract, or any subsidiary or affiliate of such employer or entity.

Prelicensing education may be offered either in a classroom, online, or by any other means approved by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.

The prelicensing education requirements approved by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry in paragraph (1) of this subsection for any state shall be accepted as credit towards completion of prelicensing education requirements in Georgia.

A person previously licensed under this article applying to be licensed again shall prove that he or she has completed all of the continuing education requirements for the year in which the license was last held.

The department is authorized to enact rules and regulations related to the expiration of prelicensing education.

In order to meet the written test requirement referred to in subsection (d) of this Code section for mortgage loan originators, an individual shall pass, in accordance with the standards established under this subsection, a qualified written test developed by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry and administered by a test provider approved by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry based upon reasonable standards.

A written test shall not be treated as a qualified written test for purposes of this subsection unless the test adequately measures the applicant’s knowledge and comprehension in appropriate subject areas, including:

Ethics;

Federal law and regulation pertaining to mortgage origination;

State law and regulation pertaining to mortgage origination; and

Federal and state law and regulation, including instruction on fraud, consumer protection, the nontraditional mortgage marketplace, and fair lending issues.

Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit a test provider approved by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry from providing a test at the location of the employer of the applicant or the location of any subsidiary or affiliate of the employer of the applicant or the location of any entity with which the applicant holds an exclusive arrangement to conduct the business of a mortgage loan originator.

An individual shall not be considered to have passed a qualified written test unless the individual achieves a test score of not less than 75 percent correct answers to questions.

An individual may retake a test three consecutive times with each consecutive taking occurring at least 30 days after the preceding test.

After failing three consecutive tests, an individual shall wait at least six months before taking the test again.

A licensed mortgage loan originator who fails to maintain a valid license for a period of five years or longer shall retake the test, not taking into account any time during which such individual is a registered mortgage loan originator.

In order to meet the annual continuing education requirements referred to in paragraph (2) of subsection (e) of Code Section 7-1-1005, a licensed mortgage loan originator shall complete at least eight hours of education approved in accordance with paragraph (2) of this subsection which shall include at least:

For purposes of paragraph (1) of this subsection, continuing education courses shall be reviewed and approved by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry based upon reasonable standards. Review and approval of a continuing education course shall include review and approval of the course provider.

Nothing in this subsection shall preclude any education course from approval by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry that is provided by the employer of the mortgage loan originator or any entity which is affiliated with the mortgage loan originator by an agency contact, or any subsidiary or affiliate of such employer or entity.

Continuing education may be offered either in a classroom, online, or by any other means approved by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.

A licensed mortgage loan originator, except for as provided for in paragraph (9) of this subsection and subsection (g) of Code Section 7-1-1005, shall only receive credit for a continuing education course in the year in which the course is taken and shall not take the same approved course in the same or successive years to meet the annual requirements for continuing education.

A licensed mortgage loan originator who is an approved instructor of an approved continuing education course may receive credit for the licensed mortgage loan originator’s own annual continuing education requirement at the rate of two hours of credit for every one hour taught.

An individual having successfully completed the education requirements approved by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry in paragraph (1) of this subsection for any state shall be accepted as credit towards completion of continuing education requirements in Georgia.

A licensed mortgage loan originator who subsequently becomes unlicensed shall complete the continuing education requirements for the last year in which the license was held prior to issuance of a new or renewed license or the prelicensing education in the event the prelicensing education has expired pursuant to the rules and regulations of the department.

An individual meeting the requirements of subsection (e) of Code Section 7-1-1005 may make up any deficiency in continuing education as established by rule or regulation of the department.

The department shall not issue or may revoke a license or registration if it finds that the mortgage loan originator, mortgage broker, or mortgage lender applicant or licensee, or any person who is a director, officer, partner, covered employee, or ultimate equitable owner of 10 percent or more of the mortgage broker or mortgage lender applicant, registrant, or licensee or any individual who directs the affairs or establishes policy for the mortgage broker or mortgage lender applicant, registrant, or licensee, has been convicted of a felony in any jurisdiction or of a crime which, if committed within this state, would constitute a felony under the laws of this state. Other than a mortgage loan originator, for the purposes of this article, a person shall be deemed to have been convicted of a crime if such person shall have pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to a charge thereof before a court or federal magistrate or shall have been found guilty thereof by the decision or judgment of a court or federal magistrate or by the verdict of a jury, irrespective of the pronouncement of sentence or the suspension thereof, and regardless of whether first offender treatment without adjudication of guilt pursuant to the charge was entered, or an adjudication or sentence was otherwise withheld or not entered on the charge, unless and until such plea of guilty, or such decision, judgment, or verdict, shall have been set aside, reversed, or otherwise abrogated by lawful judicial process or until probation, sentence, or both probation and sentence of a first offender have been successfully completed and documented, or unless the person convicted of the crime shall have received a pardon therefor from the President of the United States or the Governor or other pardoning authority in the jurisdiction where the conviction occurred or shall have received an official certification or pardon granted by the state’s pardoning body in the jurisdiction where the conviction occurred. For purposes of this article, a mortgage loan originator shall be deemed to have been convicted of a crime if he or she has pleaded guilty to, been found guilty of, or entered a first offender or nolo contendere plea to a felony in a domestic, foreign, or military court; provided, however, that any pardon of a conviction shall not be a conviction.

The department shall be authorized to obtain conviction data with respect to any mortgage loan originator, mortgage broker, or mortgage lender applicant or any person who is a director, officer, partner, covered employee, or ultimate equitable owner of 10 percent or more of the mortgage broker or mortgage lender applicant and any individual who directs the affairs of the company or establishes policy. The department may directly submit to the Georgia Crime Information Center two complete sets of fingerprints of such applicant or such person, together with the required records search fees and such other information as may be required. Fees for background checks that the department administers shall be sent to the department by applicants and licensees together with the fingerprints. Mortgage broker and mortgage lender applicants, licensees, and registrants shall have the primary responsibility for obtaining background checks of covered employees which are defined as employees who work in this state and also have the authority to enter, delete, or verify any information on any mortgage loan application form or document. The department shall, however, retain the right to obtain conviction data on covered employees.

In connection with an application for licensing with respect to any mortgage loan originator applicant, mortgage broker, or lender applicant, at the direction of the department, the applicant shall, at a minimum, furnish to the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry information concerning the applicant’s identity, including:

Fingerprints for submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation and any governmental agency or entity authorized to receive such information for a state, national, and international criminal history background check;

Personal history and experience in a form prescribed by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, including the submission of authorization for the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry and the department to obtain:

An independent credit report obtained from a consumer reporting agency described in section 603(p) of the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 1681a(f); and

Information related to any administrative, civil, or criminal findings by any governmental jurisdiction;

For the purposes set forth in this subsection and in order to reduce the points of contact which the Federal Bureau of Investigation may have to maintain for purposes of such section, the department may use the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry as a channeling agent for requesting information from and distributing information to the Department of Justice or any governmental agency; and

For the purposes of this subsection and in order to reduce the points of contact which the department may have to maintain for purposes of such subsection, the department may use the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry as a channeling agent for requesting and distributing information to and from any source so directed by the department.

Every mortgage broker and mortgage lender licensee, registrant, and applicant shall be authorized and required to obtain background checks on covered employees. Such background checks shall be handled by the Georgia Crime Information Center pursuant to Code Section 35-3-34 and the rules and regulations of the Georgia Crime Information Center. Licensees, registrants, and applicants shall be responsible for any applicable fees charged by the center. A background check shall be initiated for a person in the employ of a licensee, registrant, or applicant within ten days of the date of initial hire and be completed with satisfactory results within the first 90 days of employment. This provision shall not apply to directors, officers, partners, agents, or ultimate equitable owners of 10 percent or more or to persons who direct the company’s affairs or establish policy, whose background shall have been investigated through the department before taking office, beginning employment, or securing ownership. Upon receipt of information from the Georgia Crime Information Center that is incomplete or that indicates an employee has a criminal record in any state other than Georgia, the employer shall submit to the department two complete sets of fingerprints of such person, together with the applicable fees and any other required information. The department shall submit such fingerprints as provided in subsection (i) of this Code section.

Upon receipt of fingerprints, fees, and other required information, the Georgia Crime Information Center shall promptly transmit one set of fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a search of bureau records and an appropriate report and shall retain the other set and promptly conduct a search of its own records and records to which it has access. The Georgia Crime Information Center shall notify the department in writing of any derogatory finding, including, but not limited to, any conviction data regarding the fingerprint records check, or if there is no such finding. All conviction data received by the department or by the applicant, registrant, or licensee shall be used by the party requesting such data for the exclusive purpose of carrying out the responsibilities of this article, shall not be a public record, shall be privileged, and shall not be disclosed to any other person or agency except to any person or agency which otherwise has a legal right to inspect the file. The department shall be entitled to review any applicant’s, registrant’s, or licensee’s files to determine whether the required background checks have been run and whether all covered employees are qualified. The department shall be authorized to discuss the status of employee background checks with licensees. All such records shall be maintained by the department and the applicant or licensee or registrant pursuant to laws regarding such records and the rules and regulations of the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the Georgia Crime Information Center, as applicable. As used in this subsection, “conviction data” means a record of a finding, verdict, or plea of guilty or plea of nolo contendere with regard to any crime, regardless of whether an appeal of the conviction has been sought, subject to the conditions set forth in subsection (h) of this Code section. Violation of this Code section may subject a licensee or registrant to the revocation of its license or registration.

In connection with an application for licensing or registration under this Code section, the department may use the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, when such service is available, as a channeling agent for the submission of fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation and any governmental agency or entity authorized to receive such information for a state, national, and international criminal history background check. The department is authorized to set forth rules and regulations in order to implement the provisions of this subsection.

The department may deny or revoke a license or registration or otherwise restrict a license or registration if it finds that the mortgage broker or mortgage lender applicant or any person who is a director, officer, partner, or ultimate equitable owner of 10 percent or more or person who directs the company’s affairs or who establishes policy of the applicant has been in one or more of these roles as a mortgage lender, broker, or registrant whose license or registration has been denied, revoked, or suspended within five years of the date of the application.

The department shall not issue a license or registration to and may revoke a license or registration from a mortgage broker or mortgage lender applicant, licensee, or registrant if such person:

Has been the recipient of a final cease and desist order issued within the preceding five years if such order was based on a violation of subsection (h) of this Code section or Code Section 7-1-1002 or 7-1-1013;

Employs any other person against whom a final cease and desist order has been issued within the preceding five years if such order was based on a violation of subsection (h) of this Code section or Code Section 7-1-1002 or 7-1-1013; or

Has had his or her license revoked within five years of the date such person was hired or employs any other person who has had his or her license revoked within five years of the date such person was hired.

Each mortgage broker and mortgage lender applicant, licensee, and registrant shall, before hiring an employee, examine the department’s public records to determine that such employee is not subject to the type of cease and desist order described in subsection (o) of this Code section.

Within 90 days after receipt of a completed application and payment of licensing fees prescribed by this article, the department shall either grant or deny the request for license or registration.

A person shall not be indemnified for any act covered by this article or for any fine or penalty incurred pursuant to this article as a result of any violation of the law or regulations contained in this article, due to the legal form, corporate structure, or choice of organization of such person, including, but not limited to, a limited liability company.

(A)

Three hours of federal law and regulations;

(B)

Two hours of ethics, which shall include instruction on fraud, consumer protection, and fair lending issues; and

(C)

Two hours of training related to lending standards for the nontraditional mortgage product marketplace.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-1004

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 543, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 570, § 4; Ga. L. 1996, p. 848, § 17; Ga. L. 1998, p. 795, § 29; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 33; Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, § 27; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 7; Ga. L. 2001, p. 970, § 12; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1220, § 11; Ga. L. 2003, p. 843, § 19; Ga. L. 2004, p. 458, § 13; Ga. L. 2004, p. 631, § 7; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 32/SB 82; Ga. L. 2007, p. 502, § 34/SB 70; Ga. L. 2009, p. 252, § 1/HB 312; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 7/HB 1387; Ga. L. 2011, p. 518, § 14/HB 239; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 7/HB 142; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, §§ 6-1, 6-2/HB 811; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429; Ga. L. 2022, p. 403, § 2/SB 470.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” for “Nation-wide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” throughout this Code section; and substituted “subsection (g)” for “subsection (f)” in paragraph (g)(5).

The 2022 amendment,

effective May 2, 2022, in the first sentence in subsections (h) and (i), substituted “covered employee” for “agent, employee”; and substituted “Governor” for “governor” near the end of the second sentence in subsection (h).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, “paragraph (1) of this subsection” was substituted for “paragraph (1) of this Code section” in paragraph (e)(4).

Law reviews.

For article, “Administrative Law,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 81 (2001).

For article, “Business Associations,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 109 (2001).

7-1-1004.1.
Reports of condition.

Each mortgage broker and mortgage lender shall submit to the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry reports of condition, which shall be in such form and shall contain such information as the department and the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry may require.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-1004.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 252, § 1/HB 312; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 6-1/HB 811; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” for “Nation-wide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” twice in this Code section.

7-1-1004.2.
Licensees’ ability to challenge information.

The department shall establish a process whereby licensees may challenge information entered into the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry by the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-1004.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 252, § 1/HB 312; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 6-1/HB 811; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” for “Nation-wide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” in this Code section.

7-1-1004.3.
Visibility requirement for unique identifier of individuals originating residential mortgage loan.

The unique identifier of any person originating a residential mortgage loan shall be clearly shown on all residential mortgage loan application forms, solicitations, or advertisements, including business cards, websites, and any other documents as established by rule, regulation, or order of the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-1004.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 252, § 1/HB 312.

7-1-1005.
Renewal of licenses and registrations; expiration.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this article, all licenses and registrations issued pursuant to this article shall expire on December 31 of each year, and application for renewal shall be made annually on or before December 1 of each year.

Any licensee or registrant making proper application on or before December 1 for the renewal of a license or registration for the following calendar year shall be permitted to continue to operate pending final approval or disapproval of the application if the application for the license or registration is not acted upon prior to January 1. For purposes of this subsection, a “proper application” shall include a requirement that all documentation requesting a renewal has been completed, the requisite continuing education has been successfully obtained, and payment has been made of all outstanding fines and applicable fees required by this article.

No investigation fee shall be payable in connection with the renewal application, but an annual license or registration fee established by regulation of the department to defray the cost of supervision shall be paid with each renewal application, which fee shall not be refunded.

Any person holding a license or registration pursuant to this article who fails to file a proper application for a license or registration renewal for the following license year on or before December 1 and who files an application after December 1 may be required to pay, in addition to the license or registration fees, a fine in an amount to be established by regulations promulgated by the department.

The minimum standards for license renewal for mortgage loan originators shall include:

The mortgage loan originator continues to meet the minimum standards for license issuance;

The mortgage loan originator has satisfied the annual continuing education requirements;

The mortgage loan originator has paid all required fees for renewal of the license; and

The mortgage loan originator is in compliance with any and all written orders issued by the department.

A mortgage loan originator license shall become inactive in the event that the mortgage loan originator is no longer sponsored by a mortgage lender or mortgage broker that is licensed. A mortgage loan originator shall not act as a mortgage loan originator in this state while the license is inactive. A mortgage loan originator license shall remain in inactive status until the license expires pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section, the licensee surrenders the license, the license is revoked or suspended, or the licensee obtains sponsorship.

The department may adopt procedures for the reinstatement of expired licenses consistent with the standards established by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-1005

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 543, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 570, § 5; Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, § 28; Ga. L. 2001, p. 970, § 13; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 33/SB 82; Ga. L. 2009, p. 252, § 1/HB 312; Ga. L. 2011, p. 518, § 15/HB 239; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 6-1/HB 811; Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 34/HB 185.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added subsection (f); and redesignated former subsection (f) as present subsection (g).

Law reviews.

For article, “Business Associations,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 109 (2001).

7-1-1006.
Contents of license; posting of license; transferring of license; transacting business under other name; change of address; opening a new additional office without prior approval; approval of branch manager.

Each license issued under this article shall state the name of the licensee.

A licensee shall post a copy of such license in a conspicuous place in each place of business of the licensee.

A license shall not be transferred or assigned.

No licensee shall transact business under any name or names other than those designated in the records of the department.

For mortgage brokers and mortgage lenders, each licensee shall notify the department in writing of any change in the address of the principal place of business or of any additional location of business in Georgia, any change in registered agent or registered office, any change of executive officer or contact person for consumer complaints, or of any material change in the licensee’s financial statement. Notice of changes shall be received by the department no later than 30 business days after the change is effective.

No mortgage broker or mortgage lender shall open a new additional office in Georgia without prior approval of the department. Applications for such additional office shall be made in writing on a form prescribed by the department and shall be accompanied by payment of a $350.00 nonrefundable application fee. The application shall be approved unless the department finds that the applicant has not conducted business under this article efficiently, fairly, in the public interest, and in accordance with law. The application shall be deemed approved if notice to the contrary has not been mailed by the department to the applicant within 45 days of the date the application is received by the department.

All branch managers in Georgia shall be approved by the department. A mortgage broker or mortgage lender may place a new branch manager subject to the department’s approval but shall file for approval within 15 days of the placement and shall remove the person immediately should the department deny approval.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-1006

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 543, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 7; Ga. L. 1994, p. 570, § 6; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 34; Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, § 29; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 34/SB 82; Ga. L. 2007, p. 502, § 35/SB 70; Ga. L. 2009, p. 252, § 1/HB 312; Ga. L. 2020, p. 320, § 19/HB 781.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in the first sentence of subsection (e), substituted “officer or” for “officer,” and deleted “or ultimate equitable owner of 10 percent or more of any corporation or other entity licensed under this article,” following “consumer complaints”.

7-1-1007.
Licensee to give notice of certain actions brought against it by a creditor or borrower; notice to the department of cancellation of bond.

A licensee shall give written notice to the department of any action which may be brought against it by any creditor or borrower where such action is brought under this article, involves a claim against the bond filed with the department for the purposes of compliance with Code Section 7-1-1003.2 or 7-1-1004, or involves a claim for damages in excess of $25,000.00 for a mortgage broker or mortgage loan originator and $250,000.00 for a lender and of any judgment which may be entered against it by any creditor or any borrower or prospective borrower, with details sufficient to identify the action or judgment, within 30 days after the commencement of any such action or the entry of any such judgment.

A corporate surety shall, within ten days after it pays any claim to any claimant, give notice to the department by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery of such payment with details sufficient to identify the claimant and the claim or judgment so paid. Whenever the principal sum of such bond is reduced by one or more recoveries or payments thereon, the mortgage loan originator, mortgage broker, or mortgage lender shall furnish a new or additional bond so that the total or aggregate principal sum of such bond or bonds shall equal the sum required under Code Section 7-1-1003.2 or 7-1-1004 or shall furnish an endorsement duly executed by the corporate surety reinstating the bond to the required principal sum thereof.

A bond filed with the department for the purpose of compliance with Code Section 7-1-1003.2 or 7-1-1004 shall not be canceled by either the mortgage loan originator, mortgage broker, or mortgage lender or the corporate surety except upon notice to the department electronically through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, the cancellation to be effective not less than 30 days after receipt by the department of such notice and only with respect to any breach of condition occurring after the effective date of such cancellation.

A licensee or registrant shall, within ten days after knowledge of the event, report in writing to the department:

Any knowledge or discovery of an act prohibited by Code Section 7-1-1013;

The discharge of any employee for dishonest or fraudulent acts; and

Any administrative, civil, or criminal action initiated against the licensee, registrant, or any of its control persons by any government entity.

Any person reporting such an event shall be protected from civil liability as provided in Code Section 7-1-1009.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-1007

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 543, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 35; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1220, § 12; Ga. L. 2009, p. 252, § 1/HB 312; Ga. L. 2017, p. 193, § 25/HB 143; Ga. L. 2020, p. 320, § 20/HB 781; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 36/HB 891.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, deleted “by registered or certified mail, statutory overnight delivery with return receipt requested, or” preceding “electronically” in the middle of subsection (c).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “written notice to the department” for “notice to the department by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery” in subsection (a).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1993, “ten days” was substituted for “10 days” in the second sentence in subsection (a) (now first sentence of subsection (b)).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1999, “ten” was substituted for “10” in the introductory paragraph of subsection (d).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

7-1-1008.
Acquisition of 10 percent or more of the voting shares or of the ownership of any other entity licensed or registered to conduct business under this article.

Except as provided in this Code section, no person shall acquire directly or indirectly 10 percent or more of the voting shares of a corporation or 10 percent or more of the ownership of any other entity licensed or registered to conduct business as a mortgage broker or mortgage lender under this article unless it first:

Files an application with the department in such form as the department may prescribe from time to time;

Delivers such other information to the department as the department may require concerning the financial responsibility, background, experience, and activities of the applicant, its directors and officers, if a corporation, and its members, if applicable, and of any proposed new directors, officers, or members of the licensee or registrant; and

Pays such application fee as the department may prescribe.

Upon the filing and investigation of an application, the department shall permit the applicant to acquire the interest in the mortgage broker or mortgage lender licensee or registrant if it finds that the applicant and its members, if applicable, its directors and officers, if a corporation, and any proposed new directors and officers have the financial responsibility, character, reputation, experience, and general fitness to warrant belief that the business will be operated efficiently and fairly, in the public interest, and in accordance with law. The department shall grant or deny the application within 60 days from the date a completed application accompanied by the required fee is filed unless the period is extended by order of the department reciting the reasons for the extension. If the application is denied, the department shall notify the applicant of the denial and the reasons for the denial.

The provisions of this Code section shall not apply to:

The acquisition of an interest in a licensee or registrant directly or indirectly, including an acquisition by merger or consolidation by or with a person licensed or registered by this article or a person exempt from this article under Code Section 7-1-1001;

The acquisition of an interest in a mortgage broker or mortgage lender licensee or registrant directly or indirectly, including an acquisition by merger or consolidation by or with a person affiliated through common ownership with the licensee or registrant; or

The acquisition of an interest in a mortgage broker or mortgage lender licensee or registrant by a person by bequest, descent, or survivorship or by operation of law.

The person acquiring an interest in a mortgage broker or mortgage lender licensee or registrant in a transaction which is exempt from filing an application by this subsection shall send written notice to the department of such acquisition within 30 days of the closing of such transaction.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-1008

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 543, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 570, § 7; Ga. L. 2007, p. 502, § 36/SB 70; Ga. L. 2009, p. 252, § 1/HB 312; Ga. L. 2011, p. 518, § 16/HB 239.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1993, “from” was substituted for “form” in paragraph (c)(1).